Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.080

Payment by metropolitan park district.

Upon the confirmation of the assessment roll for a local improvement district or utility local improvement district, the city treasurer shall certify and forward to the board of park commissioners of any metropolitan park district in which the city is located, a statement of all the lots, tracts, and parcels of land or other property held or owned by the district, assessed thereon, separately describing each lot, tract, or parcel with the amount of the assessment charged against it.

The board of park commissioners shall cause the amount of the local assessments to be paid as other claims against the metropolitan park district are paid.

[ 1967 c 52 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.080. Prior: 1929 c 204 s 3; RRS s 9343-3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.